District of Columbia statutes.
9-1203.02

Sale or lease of track connection with Navy Yard authorized.

The Secretary of the Navy is authorized to sell and transfer or to lease to The Philadelphia, Baltimore, and Washington Railroad Company, its successors and/or assigns, upon such terms and for such amount as he may deem to be both just and reasonable, the existing railroad track connection with the United States Navy Yard as constructed and established under authority conferred by an Act of Congress approved August 29, 1916, entitled “An Act making appropriations for the naval service for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1917, and for other purposes”; provided, that the title to any right of way or property provided by the United States for the purposes of such construction and occupied by said track connection on June 18, 1932, shall remain in the United States; and provided further, that said track connection, insofar as the requirements of the United States Navy Yard may be affected, at all times shall be maintained and operated by said railroad company, its successors or assigns, to the satisfaction of the Secretary of the Navy.

History

June 18, 1932, 47 Stat. 322, ch. 269, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1417.
1973 Ed., § 7-1217.

References in Text

The Act approved August 29, 1916, referred to near the middle of this section, means the Act of August 29, 1916, 39 Stat. 556, ch. 417.